Louisiana, session 2026, SB255.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of Louisiana:
Section 1. R.S. 40:2162(D)(2)(a)(i) is hereby amended and reenacted to read as
follows:
§2162. Specialized behavioral health rehabilitation services in the Louisiana medical
assistance program
* * *
D. In order to be eligible to receive Medicaid reimbursement, all behavioral
health services providers shall ensure that any individual rendering PSR or CPST
services for the licensed and accredited provider agency meets all of the following
requirements:
* * *
(2)(a) Any individual rendering PSR services for a licensed and accredited
provider agency shall hold a minimum of one of the following:
(i) A bachelor's degree from an accredited university or college in the field
of counseling, social work, psychology, sociology, rehabilitation services, special
education, early childhood education, secondary education, family and consumer
Page 1 of 2
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SB NO. 255 ENROLLED
sciences, health sciences, therapeutic recreation, criminal justice, or human
growth and development.
* * *
PRESIDENT OF THE SENATE
SPEAKER OF THE HOUSE OF REPRESENTATIVES
GOVERNOR OF THE STATE OF LOUISIANA
APPROVED:
Page 2 of 2
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.